Georgia, session 2025_26, HB591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Municipal Court of the City of Cleveland shall be entitled to charge and
collect a technology fee as a surcharge to each criminal and quasi-criminal fine paid. The
technology fee shall be set by order of the judge of the court, provided that the fee shall not
exceed $10.00.
(b) The fee authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be used exclusively to provide
for the following technological needs of the court and the city's police department:
(1) The purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and
software; and
(2) The purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of equipment and software used
for imaging, scanning, facsimile, communications, projections, and printing.
H. B. 591
- 1 -

LC 47 3253/AP
(c) All funds collected pursuant to this Act shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the chief financial officer of the city and clerk of court, separate from other funds of the city,
and shall be expended only for the authorized purposes provided in this section upon
direction of the city manager. The funds may be used to reimburse the city's information
technology department for services provided to the court or police department.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 591
- 2 -